lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2791 Y 4
SFX 2791 esnis iausias/402 [^djt]esnis 123
SFX 2791 esnis žiausias/402 desnis 123
SFX 2791 esnis ausias/402 jesnis 123
SFX 2791 tesnis čiausias/402 . 123

SFX 2792 Y 4
SFX 2792 esnis iausias/403 [^djt]esnis 123
SFX 2792 esnis žiausias/403 desnis 123
SFX 2792 esnis ausias/403 jesnis 123
SFX 2792 tesnis čiausias/403 . 123

SFX 2793 Y 4
SFX 2793 esnis iausias/404 [^djt]esnis 123
SFX 2793 esnis žiausias/404 desnis 123
SFX 2793 esnis ausias/404 jesnis 123
SFX 2793 tesnis čiausias/404 . 123

SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 ausias ausias/402 . 123

SFX 2816 Y 1
SFX 2816 ausias ausias/403 . 123

SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 ausias ausias/404 . 123

SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 ausias ausiasis/396 . 120

SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 ausias ausiasis/397 . 120

SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 ausias ausiasis/398 . 120

SFX 2821 Y 34
SFX 2821 oks oks . 37
SFX 2821 oks okio . 38
SFX 2821 oks okiam . 41
SFX 2821 oks okį . 42
SFX 2821 oks okiu . 43
SFX 2821 oks okiame . 44
SFX 2821 oks okiam . 75
SFX 2821 oks oks . 51
SFX 2821 oks okie . 39
SFX 2821 oks okių . 40
SFX 2821 oks okiems . 45
SFX 2821 oks okiem . 46
SFX 2821 oks okius . 47
SFX 2821 oks okiais . 48
SFX 2821 oks okiuose . 49
SFX 2821 oks okiuos . 50
SFX 2821 oks okie . 55
SFX 2821 oks okia . 83
SFX 2821 oks okios . 84
SFX 2821 oks okiai . 87
SFX 2821 oks okią . 88
SFX 2821 oks okia . 89
SFX 2821 oks okioje . 90
SFX 2821 oks okioj . 91
SFX 2821 oks okia . 98
SFX 2821 oks okios . 85
SFX 2821 oks okių . 86
SFX 2821 oks okioms . 92
SFX 2821 oks okiom . 93
SFX 2821 oks okias . 94
SFX 2821 oks okiomis . 95
SFX 2821 oks okiom . 96
SFX 2821 oks okiose . 97
SFX 2821 oks okios . 99

SFX 2829 Y 4
SFX 2829 oks okian . 52
SFX 2829 oks okiuosna . 53
SFX 2829 oks okion . 101
SFX 2829 oks okiosna . 102

SFX 2830 Y 2
SFX 2830 oks okiedu . 135
SFX 2830 oks okiodvi . 136

SFX 2861 Y 1
SFX 2861 oks oksai/405 . 117

SFX 2862 Y 1
SFX 2862 oks oksai/406 . 117

SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 oks oksai/407 . 117

SFX 2864 Y 34
SFX 2864 is is . 37
SFX 2864 is io . 38
SFX 2864 is iam . 41
SFX 2864 is į . 42
SFX 2864 is iu . 43
SFX 2864 is iame . 44
SFX 2864 is iam . 75
SFX 2864 is is . 51
SFX 2864 is i . 39
SFX 2864 is ių . 40
SFX 2864 is iems . 45
SFX 2864 is iem . 46
SFX 2864 is ius . 47
SFX 2864 is iais . 48
SFX 2864 is iuose . 49
SFX 2864 is iuos . 50
SFX 2864 is i . 55
SFX 2864 is ė . 83
SFX 2864 is ės . 84
SFX 2864 is ei . 87
SFX 2864 is ę . 88
SFX 2864 is e . 89
SFX 2864 is ėje . 90
SFX 2864 is ėj . 91
SFX 2864 is e . 98
SFX 2864 is ės . 85
SFX 2864 is ių . 86
SFX 2864 is ėms . 92
SFX 2864 is ėm . 93
SFX 2864 is es . 94
SFX 2864 is ėmis . 95
SFX 2864 is ėm . 96
SFX 2864 is ėse . 97
SFX 2864 is ės . 99

SFX 2872 Y 4
SFX 2872 is ian . 52
SFX 2872 is iuosna . 53
SFX 2872 is ėn . 101
SFX 2872 is ėsna . 102

SFX 2873 Y 2
SFX 2873 is iu . 54
SFX 2873 is i . 103

SFX 2904 Y 34
SFX 2904 as as . 37
SFX 2904 as o . 38
SFX 2904 as am . 41
SFX 2904 as ą . 42
SFX 2904 as u . 43
SFX 2904 as ame . 44
SFX 2904 as am . 75
SFX 2904 as as . 51
SFX 2904 as 0 . 39
SFX 2904 as ų . 40
SFX 2904 as ems . 45
SFX 2904 as em . 46
SFX 2904 as us . 47
SFX 2904 as ais . 48
SFX 2904 as uose . 49
SFX 2904 as uos . 50
SFX 2904 as 0 . 55
SFX 2904 as a . 83
SFX 2904 as os . 84
SFX 2904 as ai . 87
SFX 2904 as ą . 88
SFX 2904 as a . 89
SFX 2904 as oje . 90
SFX 2904 as oj . 91
SFX 2904 as a . 98
SFX 2904 as os . 85
SFX 2904 as ų . 86
SFX 2904 as oms . 92
SFX 2904 as om . 93
SFX 2904 as as . 94
SFX 2904 as omis . 95
SFX 2904 as om . 96
SFX 2904 as ose . 97
SFX 2904 as os . 99

SFX 2912 Y 4
SFX 2912 as an . 52
SFX 2912 as uosna . 53
SFX 2912 as on . 101
SFX 2912 as osna . 102

SFX 2913 Y 2
SFX 2913 as u . 54
SFX 2913 as 0 . 103

AF 2821,2861,9999 # 24
AF 2779,2782,2785,2788,2791,9999 # 97
AF 2815,2818,9999 # 278
