lt-LT.dic
abejoks/24	8
ankstesnis/97	8
galiausias/278	8
kitokesnis/97	8
nebekoks/24	8
nekoks/24	8
neviršesnis/97	8
nevyresnis/97	8
paskesnis/97	8
paskiausias/278	8
paskučiausias/278	8
paslapčiausias/278	8
piečiausias/278	8
pirmučiausias/278	8
tolesnis/97	8
viršesnis/97	8
viršiausias/278	8
visokiausias/278	8
vyresnis/97	8
vyriausias/278	8
vėlesnis/97	8
šiauriausias/278	8
